Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB339.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1529. Mental Health Check-Ins.--(a) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year and each school year thereafter, a school entity shall adopt a policy for daily mental health check-ins at the beginning of each school day for students in kindergarten through grade twelve. The policy shall include a procedure for identifying and responding to students who:(1) through their responses to the mental health check-ins, may be experiencing stress, anxiety or depression; or(2) may be at risk of suicide or self-harm.1234567891011121314151617181920 (b) The department shall develop a model mental health check-in policy and make the policy available to each school entity and, upon request, to a nonpublic school.(c) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Mental health check-in." An activity in which participants are given the opportunity to convey, at a minimum, their feelings in that moment."Nonpublic school." A nonpublic kindergarten, elementary school or secondary school at which a resident of this Commonwealth may legally fulfill the compulsory school attendance requirements of Article XIII and which meets the requirements of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-352, 78 Stat. 241) . "School entity." A school district, charter school, regional charter school, cyber charter school, area career and technical school or intermediate unit.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0339PN0294 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021